Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 540D of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "First responder" shall include a peace officer as defined
in Section 99 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, a correctional
or probation and parole officer, and an emergency medical technician
or emergency medical care provider; and
2. "Harass" means to willfully engage in a course of conduct
directed at a first responder which intentionally distracts the
first responder from performing his or her official duties and
serves no legitimate purpose.
B. It shall be unlawful for a person, after receiving a verbal
warning not to approach from a person he or she knows or reasonably
should know is a first responder, who is engaged in the lawful
performance of a legal duty, to knowingly and willfully violate such
warning and approach or remain within twenty-five (25) feet of the
first responder with the intent to:

1. Impede or interfere with the ability of the first responder
to perform such duty;
2. Threaten the first responder with physical harm; or
3. Harass the first responder.
C. Any person who violates the provisions of this section
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by
imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed one (1)
year, or by a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00),
or by both such fine and imprisonment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1597 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1597 Page 3